District of Columbia statutes.
38-2612

CTE Grant Program Fund.

(a)

(1)

There is established the CTE Grant Program Fund, which shall be administered by OSSE in accordance with subsections (c) and (d) of this section.

(b)

The Fund shall consist of the revenue from the following sources:

(1)

Annual appropriations, if any; and

(2)

Grants, gifts, or subsidies from public or private sources.

(c)

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes set forth in § 38-2611(a).

(d)

The OSSE shall not use more than 5% of the funds in the Fund to pay the administrative expenses associated with managing the CTE grant program.

(e)

(1)

The money deposited into the Fund, and interest earned, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time.

(2)

Subject to authorization by Congress, any funds appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.

Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-176, § 7f
as added Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-87, § 2(c), 61 DCR 309
This section is referenced in § 38-2601.02 and § 38-2602.
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-87 added this section.
For temporary (225 days) addition of D.C. Law 13-176, § 7e, concerning educator evaluations, see § 2(b) of the Educator Evaluation Data Collection Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-132, Aug. 8, 2014, 61 DCR 6338).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 13-176, § 7e, concerning educator evaluations, see § 2(b) of the Educator Evaluation Data Collection Emergency Amendment Act of 2014, (D.C. Act 20-328, May 22, 2014, 61 DCR 5361).